Hawaii statutes.
§304A-3002 Board of directors; composition.
The affairs of the research corporation shall be under the general management
and control of the board of directors. The board of directors shall consist of
eight members as follows:

(1) Two members of the board of regents of the
University of Hawaii, selected by the board of regents for terms to be
determined by the board of regents; provided that no term shall extend beyond
the term as a member of the board of regents;

(2) Three members to be appointed by the governor
pursuant to section 26-34; provided that:

(A) One member shall be a University of Hawaii
system research faculty member;

(B) One member shall be from the business
sector; and

(C) One member shall be a representative of a
non-University of Hawaii research organization;

(3) One member to be appointed by the president of
the senate;

(4) One member to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives; and

(5) The
vice president for research of the University of Hawaii system, who shall be a
nonvoting[,] ex officio member of the board of directors.

All the members appointed by the governor, president
of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives shall serve for a
term of four years, except that the governor may reduce the terms of those
initially appointed to provide, as nearly as can be, for the expiration of an
equal number of terms at intervals of one year, each term commencing on
July 1 and expiring on June 30. All members of the board of
directors shall serve without pay, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for
necessary expenses while attending meetings and while in the discharge of
duties and responsibilities.

The members of the board of directors shall
elect the chairperson of the board. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 288,
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next